Washington statutes.
RCW 4.105.080

Appeal.

A moving party may appeal as a matter of right from an order denying, in whole or in part, a motion under RCW 4.105.020. The appeal must be filed not later than twenty-one days after entry of the order.

[ 2021 c 259 s 9.]